Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Chapter 39. Contracts and Claims

§ 21-39-1.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1983, ch. 469, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

[Codes, 1906, § 3446; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 6006, 6060; 1930, §§ 2616, 2648; 1942, §§ 3374-83, 3374-107; Laws, 1912, ch. 120; 1922, ch. 222; 1950, ch. 491, §§ 83, 107]

§ 21-39-3.
Letting of contracts for publication of proceedings, ordinances, etc.

In municipalities in which there is more than one newspaper qualified to publish legal notices, the governing authorities of such municipality shall enter into a contract for the publication of its proceedings, ordinances, resolutions, and other notices required to be published only after inviting competitive bids from such newspapers. Such contracts shall be let to the lowest bidder among them for a period of not more than twelve months from the date of such contract. It shall not be necessary, however, that the governing authorities of such municipality advertise its intention to accept such competitive bids but it shall be sufficient if notice thereof in writing be given to all of such newspapers by mail or delivery at least five days prior to the date on which said bids will be received, which said notice shall specify the date on which such bids will be received.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-111.5; Laws, 1950, ch. 519, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-39-5.
Records and payment of claims in all municipalities.

The clerk of the municipality shall open and keep a regular set of records, as prescribed by the State Auditor, as the head of the State Department of Audit, or the director thereof, appointed by him, as designated and defined in Title 7, Chapter 7, of the Mississippi Code of 1972, or any office or officers hereafter designated to replace or perform the duties imposed by said chapter, subject always to inspection within office hours by any citizen desiring to inspect the same. Said records shall contain accounts, under headings, corresponding with the several headings of the budget, so that the expenditures under each head may be at once known. Such records shall be paid for out of the general municipal fund, upon the order of the proper municipal authorities. Said clerk shall also mark filed, as of the date of presentation of same, each and every claim against said municipality. He shall number the same in regular consecutive order, shall file and keep the same in like manner, and shall safely preserve the same as records of his office.

Each year’s records shall be kept separate and begin with a new number each year, and run in regular order.

In issuing any warrant under order of the governing authorities of the municipality to pay any one of said claims so numbered and kept, said clerk shall enter the number of the claim in the body of the warrant so that the claim may be easily found, and so that possible duplication may be avoided. The governing authorities of the municipality shall designate on each allowance of a claim against the municipality the fund out of which same shall be paid, and to what account the sums shall be charged in said records. Each allowance shall have the number of the claim noted in the minutes of said governing authorities.

For failure to perform any duty herein required, said clerk shall be subject to suit on his bond for any damage which the municipality may sustain by reason of such failure. Such suit, or suits, shall be brought by the city attorney or by any attorney designated and empowered to do so by the proper governing authorities of such municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3972; 1942, § 9121-05; Laws, 1922, ch. 225; Laws, 1950, ch. 497, § 5; Laws, 1995, ch. 447, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 21-39-7.
Docket of claims in municipalities having a population of more than two thousand.

In all municipalities having a population of more than two thousand (2,000), according to the latest federal census, and in other municipalities where the governing authorities should so elect, it shall be the duty of the clerk of the municipality to keep as a record in his office a record to be styled “Docket of Claims,” in which he shall enter all demands, claims and accounts against the municipality presented to him during the month. Said docket shall provide space for the name of the claimant, the number of the claim, the amount of the claim, and on what account. All demands, claims and accounts allowed against the municipality shall be preserved by the clerk as a permanent record, and shall be numbered in such a manner as to relate to the warrants to be issued therefor, and the said warrant issued in payment of such claim shall carry on its face a reference to the number of the claim for which the said warrant is issued in payment. No order for the payment or expenditures of any funds of such municipality in payment of any indebtedness thereof shall be made in municipalities having a claim docket unless such claim is filed as herein provided. However, this provision shall not be applicable to the salaries or other compensation of officers or employees of such municipality where the amount of such salary or other compensation shall have been previously fixed by the governing authorities of the municipality in its approval of the payroll or payrolls on which the same appears, and in case of such allowance, it will be sufficient to enter on the claims docket the total of such payroll, followed by reference to the said payroll upon which such allowance may be found.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2995; 1906, § 3392; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5920; 1930, § 2529; 1942, § 3374-86; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 86; Laws, 1985, ch. 519, § 7; Laws, 1995, ch. 447, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 21-39-9.
Disposition of claims.

At each regular meeting of the governing authorities of the municipality the claims docket shall be called and all claims then on file not previously paid shall be paid by the governing authorities in the order in which they were entered on the docket.

The processing of claims by the governing authority of the municipality shall be subject to the provisions of Sections 31-7-301, 31-7-305, 31-7-309, 31-7-311 and 31-7-313.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-87; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 87; Laws, 1986, ch. 489, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 1986).

§ 21-39-11.
Appeals.

Any person aggrieved by any order of the governing authorities of any municipality, with reference to the order in which claims are allowed and paid, shall have the right of appeal to the circuit court of the county in which the municipality is situated as provided by Section 11-51-75, except that an appeal from an order, or any other action of the governing authorities of the municipality, especially preferring payment of one allowed claim over another allowed claim shall operate as a supersedeas and prevent the payment of the claim then allowed until the matter is finally determined on the appeal.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-87; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 87, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-39-13.
Issuance of warrants or checks; assignment thereof.

The clerk of the municipality shall draw all warrants or checks for claims and accounts allowed and approved by the governing authorities. Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c), the warrants or checks shall be signed by the mayor or a majority of the members of the board of aldermen in any municipality operating under a mayor-alderman form of government, and attested by the clerk, and to which there shall be affixed the seal of the municipality. The governing authorities of any municipality may adopt the use of a standard check signing machine to be used in lieu of the manual signing of warrants or checks under such terms and conditions as the governing authorities shall deem meet and proper for the protection of the interest of the municipality.

A municipality may authorize a municipally owned utility to make early payments to its electricity suppliers for the purpose of receiving early payment discounts from such distributors.

The governing authorities of a municipality may authorize the clerk of the municipality to issue a warrant or check for the purpose of immediately refunding to a customer of the municipally owned utility his or her deposit for municipal utility services after the municipal utility has determined that payment for all services and any other obligations which the customer may have incurred in regard to the municipal utility has been made.

Every warrant or check drawn on the treasury shall express on its face to whom issued and for what purpose allowed, and the ordinance authorizing its issuance shall be cited, by minute book and page, in or upon it.

All such warrants or checks shall be drawn against the proper fund in the municipality from which such allowed claims shall be paid, and all such warrants or checks shall be drawn in the order of their allowance. No warrant or check shall be signed, removed from the warrant book or checkbook or delivered by the clerk until there is sufficient money in the fund upon which it is drawn to pay the same and all prior unpaid warrants or checks drawn upon that fund, whether delivered or not.

The owner of any claim against a municipality, either before or after allowance, may transfer same by assignment, and the holder of such assignment shall be entitled to receive the warrant or check therefor at the proper time by presenting such assignment to the clerk at any time before the delivery of the warrant or check to the original claimant.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, §§ 2981, 3003, 3004; 1906, §§ 3379, 3401, 3402; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 5907, 5931, 5932; 1930, §§ 2515, 2539, 2540; 1942, §§ 3374-88, 3374-89; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, §§ 88, 89; Laws, 1980, ch. 308; Laws, 1992, ch. 358, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 347, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 21-39-15.
Penalty for unauthorized claim or appropriation.

If any member of the governing body of a municipality shall knowingly vote for the payment of any claim not authorized by law, he shall be subject to indictment and, upon conviction, be fined by a sum not exceeding double the amount of such unlawful claim or appropriation, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than three months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 3431; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5991; 1930, § 2593; 1942, § 3374-84; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 84, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-39-17.
Penalty for wrongfully issuing, signing or attesting warrant.

All expenditures of money from the treasury of any municipality for any purpose whatsoever shall be in pursuance of the allowance of a claim as hereinbefore specified in Section 21-39-9, or in pursuance of a specific appropriation made by order, which such appropriation shall be specific as to each separate expenditure in so far as may be practical. If the mayor, clerk, or any other person shall wilfully or feloniously issue, sign or attest any warrant for the expenditure of money from the municipal treasury when such expenditure is not authorized by an order entered on the minutes of such municipality, then such person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the court. In addition such person shall, upon conviction, automatically be removed from his office.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, §§ 3003, 3004; 1906, §§ 3401, 3402; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 5931, 5932; 1930, §§ 2539, 2540; 1942, § 3374-89; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 89, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-39-19.
Duties of depository or treasurer.

The depository of the municipality, or the clerk as ex-officio treasurer where there is no depository, shall receive, safely keep, and pay out all moneys belonging to the municipality according to law. The depository or clerk shall keep correct and accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements, and shall make a written report to the governing authorities, at each regular meeting, of the finances of the municipality. The depository or clerk shall perform such other duties as may be prescribed by ordinance. The funds of the municipality shall be paid out only by virtue of an order or ordinance duly spread on the minutes of such municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2999; 1906, § 3396; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5924; 1930, § 2533; 1942, § 3374-102; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 102, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-39-21.
Disposition of lost, stolen, abandoned or misplaced personal property.

The governing authorities of any municipality, upon the receipt or recovery of any lost, stolen, abandoned or misplaced personal property by the marshal, police or other officers of such municipality, shall cause to be posted, in three (3) public places in the municipality, notice that such property has been received or recovered. Such notice shall contain an accurate and detailed description of such property and, if the governing authorities are advised as to who owns such property, a copy of such notice shall be mailed to such person or persons in addition to being posted as herein required. The owner of such property may recover the same by filing a claim with the governing authorities of the municipality and establishing his right thereto. The governing authorities may require bond of the person claiming the property before delivering same to him. Parties having adverse claims to said property may proceed according to law as now provided by statutes.

If no person claims the property within one hundred twenty (120) days from the date the notice provided for above is given, the governing authorities of the municipality shall cause the same to be sold at public auction to the highest bidder for cash after first posting notice of such sale in three (3) public places in the municipality at least ten (10) days preceding the date of such sale. The notice shall contain a detailed and accurate description of the property to be sold and shall be addressed to the unknown owners or other persons interested in the property to be sold. The notice shall also set forth the date, time and place such sale is to be conducted and shall designate the person who is to make the sale, which person shall be some official designated by the governing authorities of the municipality.

However, lost, stolen, abandoned or misplaced motor vehicles and bicycles may be sold in the manner provided in the preceding paragraph after the expiration of ninety (90) days from their receipt or recovery by the officers of a municipality.

The person or officer designated and making the sale of such property shall promptly upon completion of the sale deliver to the clerk of the municipality a copy of the notice authorizing the sale, a list of the property sold, the amount paid for each item, the person to whom each item was sold, and all monies received from such sale, whereupon, the clerk shall deposit the monies in the general fund of the municipality and shall file the information concerning the sale among the other records of his office.

If, within ninety (90) days after date of the sale provided for above, any person claims to be the owner of the property sold, the governing authorities shall, upon satisfactory proof of ownership, pay to such person the amount for which such property was sold, and the governing authorities of the municipality may require of such person a bond in such cases as they may deem advisable. No action shall be maintained against a municipality or any of its officers or employees or the purchaser at the sale for any property sold hereunder or the proceeds therefrom after the expiration of ninety (90) days from the date of the sale as herein authorized.

A municipality may deduct wrecker and storage fees, not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), from the amount returned to the owner after the sale of property by the municipality. However, a municipality may not deduct wrecker and storage fees from the amount returned to the owner if the owner can prove the property was stolen and notifies the municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-168; Laws, 1946, ch. 289; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 168; Laws, 1968, ch. 553; Laws, 1974, ch. 526; Laws, 1993, ch. 526, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 486, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2003.

§ 21-39-23.
Applicability of particular sections.

The provisions of Sections 21-39-1, 21-39-3, 21-39-7 through 21-39-19, shall be applicable to all municipalities of this state, whether operating under a code charter, special charter, or the commission form of government, except in cases of conflict between the provisions of such sections and the provisions of the special charter of a municipality, or the law governing the commission form of government, in which cases of conflict the provisions of the special charter or the statutes relative to the commission form of government shall control.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-111; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 111, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-39-25.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1988, Ex. Sess., ch. 14, § 74, eff from and after passage (approved August 16, 1988).

[En Laws, 1974, ch. 444, §§ 1-3]

§ 21-39-27.
Municipalities authorized to obtain credit cards for official travel by members of governing authority and municipal employees.

The governing authority of any municipality may acquire one or more credit cards which may be used by members of the governing authority and municipal employees to pay expenses incurred by them when traveling in or out of the state in the performance of their official duties. The municipal clerk shall maintain complete records of all credit card numbers and all receipts and other documents relating to the use of such credit cards.

The members of the governing authority and municipal employees shall furnish receipts for the use of such credit cards each month to the municipal clerk who shall submit a written report monthly to the governing authority. The report shall include an itemized list of all expenditures and use of the credit cards for the month, and such expenditures may be allowed for payment by the municipality in the same manner as other items on the claims docket.

The issuance of a credit card to a member of the governing authority or municipal employee under the provisions of this section does not authorize the member of the governing authority or municipal employee to use the credit card to make any expenditure that is not otherwise authorized by law. Any member of the governing authority or municipal employee who uses the credit card to make an expenditure that is not approved for payment by the governing authority shall be personally liable for the expenditure and shall reimburse the municipality.

The employee shall be subject to all interest and fees and other charges related to the collection of expenditures not approved by the governing authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 399, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 14, 2003.).